Texas, session 892, HB194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Chapter 370, Local Government Code, is amended by adding Section 370.010 to read as follows: Sec. 370.010.  FLOOD SAFETY SIGNAGE IN CERTAIN AREAS IN FLOOD-PRONE MUNICIPALITIES AND COUNTIES.  (a)  In this section, "100-year floodplain" means an area with a one percent or greater chance of inundation by a flood in any given year as designated in maps or other data from the Federal Emergency Management Agency or in soil maps from the United States Department of Agriculture. (b)  This section applies only to a municipality or county in which a disaster involving storms or flooding has been declared in accordance with state or federal law at least once in the preceding 10 years. (c)  A municipality in the municipality's boundaries or county in the county's unincorporated area shall install signs: (1)  in public locations in which people commonly gather that are located in the 100-year floodplain; and (2)  that indicate the location of an area outside the 100-year floodplain to assist individuals seeking safety from a flood. SECTION 2.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.